Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 513.075, is amended to read: 513.075 COHABITATION; PROPERTY AND FINANCIAL AGREEMENTS. If sexual relations between the parties are contemplated, a contract between deleted text begin a man and a womandeleted text end new text begin the partiesnew text end who are living together in this state out of wedlock, or who are about to commence living together in this state out of wedlock, is enforceable as to terms concerning the property and financial relations of the parties only if: (1) the contract is written and signed by the parties; and (2) enforcement is sought after termination of the relationship.